Utah statutes.
59-10-1017.   Utah Educational Savings Plan tax credit.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Account owner" is as defined in Section 53B-8a-102.
(b)  "Higher education costs" is as defined in Section 53B-8a-102.
(c)  "Maximum amount of a qualified investment for the taxable year" means,
for a taxable year:
(i)  for a claimant, estate, or trust that is an account owner, if that
claimant, estate, or trust is other than husband and wife account owners who
file a single return jointly, the maximum amount of a qualified investment:
(A)  listed in Subsection 53B-8a-106(1)(e)(ii); and
(B)  increased or kept for that taxable year in accordance with Subsections
53B-8a-106(1)(f) and (g); or
(ii)  for claimants who are husband and wife account owners who file a single
return jointly, the maximum amount of a qualified investment:
(A)  listed in Subsection 53B-8a-106(1)(e)(iii); and
(B)  increased or kept for that taxable year in accordance with Subsections
53B-8a-106(1)(f) and (g).
(d)  "Qualified investment" is as defined in Section 53B-8a-102.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1002.2, a claimant, estate, or trust
that is an account owner may claim a nonrefundable tax credit equal to the
product of:
(a)  the lesser of:
(i)  the amount of a qualified investment the claimant, estate, or trust:
(A)  makes during the taxable year; and
(B)  does not deduct:
(I)  for a claimant, on the claimant's federal individual income tax return;
or
(II)  for an estate or trust, on the estate's or trust's federal income tax
return for estates and trusts; or
(ii)  the maximum amount of a qualified investment for the taxable year if the
amount described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) is greater than the maximum amount of
a qualified investment for the taxable year; and
(b)  5%.
(3)  A tax credit under this section may not be carried forward or carried
back.
